Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,185
Board; members; qualifications.

The membership of the board shall consist of one member who represents owners and users of boilers and has experience with boilers, one member who represents sellers of boilers, one member who represents the crafts involved in the construction, repair, or operation of boilers, one member who represents the insurance industry, one member who is a licensed professional engineer with experience with boilers, one member who represents the interest of public safety, and one member who represents the public. The state boiler inspector shall be a nonvoting member of the board.

Laws 1988, LB 863, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-740;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 21.